Massachusetts, session 194th, H5563.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 132B of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the town of Ayer may regulate through local bylaw or board of health
regulation the use or sale of second generation anti-coagulant rodenticides within the town of
Ayer, including prohibiting the use of such pesticides by licensed commercial applicators as
defined in 333C.M.R.10.00.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1